Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.020

Planning agency—Creation—Powers and duties—Conflicts of interest.

By ordinance a code city may create a planning agency and provide for its membership, organization, and expenses. The planning agency shall serve in an advisory capacity to the chief administrative officer or the legislative body, or both, as may be provided by ordinance and shall have such other powers and duties as shall be provided by ordinance. If any person or persons on a planning agency concludes that he or she has a conflict of interest or an appearance of fairness problem with respect to a matter pending before the agency so that he or she cannot discharge his or her duties on such an agency, he or she shall disqualify himself or herself from participating in the deliberations and the decision-making process with respect to the matter. If this occurs, the appointing authority that appoints such a person may appoint a person to serve as an alternate on the agency to serve in his or her stead in regard to such a matter.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3041; 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 33; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.63.020.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.